Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-616.02
Filing and registering of information; additional methods authorized.

Information required in certificates or reports authorized by sections 71-605.02, 71-612, and 71-616.01 may be filed and registered by electronic or other means if authorized by the department and as prescribed by department regulation.

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 52.